Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1204.03
Firearms and
violence; legislative findings.

The Legislature
finds that:

(1) Increased violence at schools has become a national,
state, and local problem;

(2) Increased violence and the threat of violence has a grave
and detrimental impact on the educational process in Nebraska schools;

(3) Increased violence has caused fear and concern among not
only the schools and students but the public at large;

(4) Firearms have contributed greatly to the increase of fear
and concern among our citizens;

(5) Schools have a duty to protect their students and provide
an environment which promotes and provides an education in a nonthreatening
manner;

(6) An additional danger of firearms at schools
is the risk of accidental discharge and harm to students and staff;

(7) Firearms are an immediate and inherently dangerous threat
to the safety and well-being of an educational setting; and

(8) The ability to confiscate and remove firearms quickly
from school grounds is a legitimate and necessary tool to protect students
and the educational process.

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB430, § 7.